Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 8

Regulations

45-3-801. Supervision of associations.

Every person doing a savings and loan business under the laws of this state shall be subject to supervision by the commissioner and the regulations promulgated by the commissioner. However, any regulation promulgated by the commissioner that has not been revised or amended in more than five (5) years may be waived by the commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, as the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate to maintain a competitive balance among state chartered savings and loan associations, state chartered savings banks, federally chartered savings and loan associations and federally chartered savings banks.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.01; T.C.A., § 45-1508; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§45-3-801 —45-3-819 (Acts 1974, ch. 698, §§ 18-36; 1977, ch. 113, § 1) concerning taxation and regulation of savings and loan associations, were repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01 and the present provisions substituted therefor.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Cross-References. Conversion of financial institutions, title 45, ch. 11.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 5.

45-3-802. Books and records.

Every association shall keep at the home office correct and complete books of account and minutes of the proceedings of stockholders or members, as the case may be, and of directors. Complete records of all business transacted at the home office shall be maintained at the home office. Records of business transacted at any branch office may be kept at the branch office; provided, that control records of all business transacted at each branch office or agency shall be maintained at the home office.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.02; T.C.A., § 45-1509.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 5.

45-3-803. Forms — Records — Accounting practices.

Every association shall use forms, and keep other records, including, but not limited to, those of its stockholders or members, that the commissioner may from time to time require. Subject to any rules or regulations promulgated by the commissioner, every association shall observe accounting principles and practices that are in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and practices.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.03; T.C.A., § 45-1510.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-804. Misdescription of assets.

No association by any system of accounting or any device of bookkeeping shall, either directly or indirectly, enter any of its assets upon its books in the name of any other person or under any title or designation that is not truly descriptive of the assets.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.04; T.C.A., § 45-1511.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-805. Charging off or setting up reserves against bad assets.

The commissioner, after a determination of value, may order that assets, individually or in the aggregate, to the extent that the assets are overvalued on an association's books, be charged off, or that a special reserve or reserves equal to the overvaluation be set up by transfers from surplus, undivided profits or reserves.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.05; T.C.A., § 45-1512.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-806. Reproduction and destruction of records.

Any association may cause any or all records kept by the association to be copied or reproduced by any photostatic, photographic, or microfilming process that correctly and permanently copies, reproduces, or forms a medium for copying or reproducing the original record on a film or other durable material. In the event of the loss or destruction of the original record, the copy or reproduction shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes and shall be treated as an original record in all courts or administrative agencies for the purpose of its admissibility in evidence. A facsimile, exemplification, or certified copy shall, for all purposes, be deemed a facsimile, exemplification or certified copy of the original record.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.06; T.C.A., § 45-1513.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-807. Confidentiality of records.

An association may decline to disclose its books, papers and other records, except:

Pursuant to court order or subpoena;

To the commissioner and any authorized examiners, attorneys, or other employees of the department;

To the members of the board of directors of the association; or

To the holder of a deposit account, or a member or a stockholder to the extent of records concerning the deposit holder's, member's, or stockholder's respective account only.

A stockholder may make written request for access to other books, papers, and records of the association for any proper purpose, in which event the association may request a determination from the commissioner as to whether a proper purpose exists, and the determination of the commissioner shall be conclusive.

A stockholder may include in the stockholder's written request that a communication be transmitted to the stockholders of the association, and upon payment of reasonable costs therefor, the association shall cause the communication to be transmitted to the stockholders immediately, subject to regulation by the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.07; T.C.A., § 45-1514.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

45-3-808. Annual audit.

Each association shall at least once in each year cause its books and accounts to be audited at its own expense by a certified public accountant or firm of certified public accountants selected by the association and approved by the commissioner. The annual audit shall cover the twelve (12) months ending on the last day of its fiscal year, unless the commissioner prescribes a different period for any association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.08; T.C.A., § 45-1515.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-809. Annual report.

Each association shall furnish the commissioner, annually, within ninety (90) days after the end of the period covered by the audit, or a shorter time that is prescribed by the commissioner, an annual written report, in the form prescribed by the commissioner, of its affairs and operations, which shall include a complete statement of its financial condition, certified by the president or a vice president and attested by the secretary or an assistant secretary, including two (2) signed copies of the report of the auditor showing the result of the audit, and including a balance sheet of the association as of the date of the audit and a statement of the income and expenses of the association during the year ending with the date of the audit.

The balance sheet and statement of income and expenses shall be certified by the auditor making the audit.

The commissioner may require other information in the annual report that the commissioner deems necessary to provide the commissioner with information as to all aspects of the financial condition of the association and may prescribe the scope of the annual audit, and require the auditor to furnish the commissioner with information additional to that contained in the report of the auditor.

The commissioner may also require that copies of the annual report be mailed to stockholders or members in the form and manner that the commissioner prescribes.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.09; T.C.A., § 45-1516.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-810. Additional and special reports.

Monthly Reports. Every association shall, within ten (10) days after each calendar month, furnish the commissioner with a monthly report of the operations and financial condition of the association, in the form and containing the information that the commissioner prescribes.

Special Reports. The commissioner may call for a special report from any association, in the form and containing the information that the commissioner prescribes.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.10; T.C.A., § 45-1517.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-811. Financial statements.

Publication. Every association shall prepare and publish annually, on or before a date prescribed by the commissioner in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the home office of the association is located, a statement of its financial condition, in the form and containing the information prescribed by the commissioner as of the last business day of its previous fiscal year. It is the duty of the commissioner to see that each association has published its statement in accordance with the form prescribed, and to check the published statement, using the newspaper clipping furnished the commissioner by the association, with the annual report of the association filed with the commissioner. If the statement is not published by the association, the commissioner shall, at the expense of the association, publish the statement.

Discrepancies; Republication; Penalties. In the event there are discrepancies in the published statement of the association and the annual report furnished to the commissioner, and if, in the opinion of the commissioner, the discrepancies are due to clerical errors, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to notify the association to publish its statement so as to conform with the annual report filed with the commissioner, and it shall be the duty of the association to make the republication. If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the discrepancies in the published statement and annual report are not due to clerical errors, it shall be the duty of the commissioner forthwith to publish a true and correct statement as shown by the annual report filed with the commissioner, stating in the publication that the published statement of the association did not conform to the annual report on file with the commissioner, and it shall be the duty of the association to pay the cost and expenses of the publication by the commissioner. Any association that fails or refuses to pay the cost and expenses of the publication by the commissioner of any statement of the association made pursuant to the requirements of this section, shall forfeit to the state one hundred dollars ($100), in addition to the costs and expenses of the publication, which sum the commissioner shall sue for and recover in the name of the state in any court having jurisdiction.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.11; T.C.A., § 45-1518.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-812. Examination of associations.

Duty to Examine. The commissioner shall, either personally or by competent examiner or examiners appointed by the commissioner, visit and examine every association subject to the commissioner's supervision on a regular basis.

Requirements of Examination. On every examination, inquiry shall be made as to the condition and resources of the association, the mode of conducting and managing the affairs of the association, the actions of its directors, the making of loans and other investment of funds of the association, the safety and prudence of the management of the association, and whether the requirements of its charter and bylaws have been complied with in the administration of the affairs of the association, and as to such other matters that the commissioner prescribes.

Other Examinations. In addition, the commissioner has the power, and it is the commissioner's duty, to examine or cause to be examined the affairs of every association whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, the management and condition of the association is such as to render an examination of its affairs necessary or expedient, or whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, the interest of the depositors, other creditors, stockholders, or members demands an examination.

Examination of Service Organizations. The commissioner also has the power to examine or cause to be examined any service organization, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting capital stock of which is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by any association subject to this chapter.

Oaths; Examinations; Appearances. The commissioner, and every examiner acting under or appointed by the commissioner, has the power and authority to administer oaths and to examine under oath any person whose testimony may be required on the examination of any association, or on the examination of any service organization, and may compel by court order the appearance and attendance of the person for the purpose of the examination, if the appearance and attendance is not voluntarily offered.

Request for Examinations. Any director, officer, stockholder, or member of an association, or any depositor or other creditor of an association, may call upon the commissioner at any time, to make an examination of the association in which the person is interested, which examination the commissioner, either in person or by an examiner, may or may not make, in the exercise of the commissioner's or examiner's discretion; provided, that, unless the commissioner deems an examination necessary under this section, the commissioner shall not make the examination unless and until the one making the request has deposited with the department, in advance, a sum sufficient to cover the cost of the examination.

Duties of Examiners.

Each examiner shall act under the direction of the commissioner, and shall forthwith examine fully into the books, papers, and affairs of the association that the examiner may be directed by the commissioner to examine.

The commissioner shall furnish to each examiner a commission under the signature of the commissioner and official seal of the department, which commission the examiner shall exhibit to the officer or officers of the association proposed to be examined as the examiner's authority for making the examination.

Each examiner shall report on oath to the commissioner the result of each examination made by the examiner, which report the commissioner shall keep on file in the commissioner's office; and when the commissioner in person makes an examination of the affairs of any association, the commissioner shall in like manner make out a report under oath of the result of the examination, and the same shall be kept on file in the office of the commissioner. A duplicate copy of the report shall be furnished to the association examined.

Examinations Made by Other Agencies; Joint Examinations. In lieu of examination by the commissioner, the commissioner may accept any examination made by the federal home loan bank board, the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, any other insuring agency approved by the commissioner, or by certified public accountants approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may examine or cause to be examined any association in conjunction with an examination by the federal home loan bank board, the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, or any other insuring agency approved by the commissioner, and shall accept any audit made or accepted by any of the agencies during the course of any examination of an association. Two (2) copies of the audit, signed and certified by the auditor making the audit, shall be filed promptly with the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.12; T.C.A., § 45-1519.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

45-3-813. Commissioner authorized to have appraisals made at expense of association.

The commissioner is authorized, in connection with any examination or audit of any association, to cause to be made appraisals of real estate owned or held by the association as security or otherwise when specific facts or information with respect to the real estate, or when in the commissioner's opinion the association's policies, practices, operating results, and trends, give evidence that an association's appraisals may be excessive, that lending or investment may be of a marginal nature, that appraisal policies and practices may not conform with generally accepted and established professional standards, or that real estate held by the association for any purpose is overvalued. In lieu of causing the appraisals to be made, the commissioner may accept any appraisal caused to be made by the federal home loan bank board, or by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation or other insuring agency approved by the commissioner under this chapter. Unless otherwise ordered by the commissioner, appraisal of real estate in connection with any examination or audit pursuant to this section shall be made by a professional appraiser or appraisers selected by the commissioner, and the cost of the appraisal shall be paid promptly by the association directly to the appraiser or appraisers upon receipt by the association of a statement of the cost bearing the written approval of the commissioner. A copy of the report of each appraisal caused to be made by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be furnished to the association within a reasonable time, not to exceed sixty (60) days following the completion of the appraisals, and may be furnished to the insuring agency.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.13; T.C.A., § 45-1520.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

45-3-814. Disclosure of information — Reports as evidence.

Disclosure of Information. The information obtained by the commissioner or any examiner in making an examination into the affairs of the association shall be for the purpose of ascertaining the true condition of the affairs of the association, and shall not be disclosed by the party making the examination to any person, except that the examiner shall make a report of the condition of the affairs of the association ascertained from the examination to the commissioner and except that the commissioner may take action as a result of the report as provided by this chapter. The commissioner may in the commissioner's discretion disclose reports of examination to other state financial institutions regulatory agencies.

Unlawful Disclosure. It is unlawful for the commissioner or any examiner, attorney or other employee of the department to make or report to any person any list of names of the depositors, debtors, or stockholders of any association, or to disclose to any person information as to who are the depositors, debtors, or stockholders or the amounts of the several deposits, debts or shares of stock owned by any stockholder, except as provided by this chapter.

Reports as Evidence. In the event the commissioner takes possession of the business and affairs of any association as authorized by this chapter, the report of the commissioner, or examiner relating to the association on file in the office of the commissioner, may be used in any court, either by the commissioner or examiner or by the association, as evidence to the extent that the same is competent as evidence, or as an aid in arriving at the true condition of the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.14; T.C.A., § 45-1521; Acts 1986, ch. 556, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

45-3-815. Access to records — Summons — Oaths and examination of witnesses.

The commissioner and any authorized examiners, attorneys, or other employees of the department shall have free access to all books, papers, and other records of an association, and to all books, papers, and other records kept by any officer, agent, or employee, relating to or upon which any records of its business were kept, and may summon witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of the directors, officers, agents, or employees of the association, service organization, or any other person in relation to its affairs, transactions, and condition, and may require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents by court order, if not voluntarily produced.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.15; T.C.A., § 45-1522.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-816. Additional supervisory powers.

In addition to other powers conferred upon the commissioner by this chapter, the commissioner has the power to require associations subject to the commissioner's supervision to:

Charge Off Assets. Charge off the whole or part of an asset that at the time of its acquisition could not lawfully have been acquired and that could not lawfully be retained at the time of the commissioner's action; provided, that the commissioner's action is within two (2) years of the aforementioned acquisition;

Recordation. Record liens and security in property;

Financial Statement. Obtain a financial statement from each borrower before making any loan to the extent that the association can do so;

Title Search, etc. Search, or obtain insurance as to, the title to real estate taken as security, or both; and

Other Insurance. Maintain adequate insurance against other risks that the commissioner determines to be necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors, other creditors, and stockholders.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.16; T.C.A., § 45-1523.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-817. Commissioner's power to act in certain instances.

Insufficient Reserves. If the reserves of an association fall below the level specified by this chapter or by the rules and regulations of the commissioner, the commissioner shall require the association to increase its reserves, within the time and manner prescribed by the commissioner, so as to bring the sum of the reserves to the level so required, and shall, in addition and to the extent that the commissioner deems it necessary to protect the association and the public, require the association to take any one (1) or more of the actions set forth in subsection (c).

Unsound Business Practices. In addition to the powers conferred upon the commissioner by any other provision of this chapter, if the commissioner determines that the association is engaging or has engaged in unsound and imprudent business practices that have caused or may cause the association to be in an impaired condition, the commissioner shall have the power to take any one (1) or more of the actions set forth in subsection (c).

Powers of Commissioner. In the event that subsections (a) or (b) are applicable to any association, the commissioner may require the association to do any one (1) or more of the following:

Increase its liquid assets and maintain the increased liquid assets at a level prescribed by the commissioner;

Cease accepting all deposit accounts, cease accepting particular classes or categories of deposit accounts or limit the amounts of particular classes or categories of deposit accounts to be accepted;

Cease all lending, lending in a particular area, or making a particular type or category of loan;

Cease or limit the purchase of loans or other investments;

Cease or limit promotional expenditures;

Convene a meeting of the board of directors of the association with the commissioner or the commissioner's delegate in attendance to accomplish the purpose of this section; and

Take other steps the commissioner deems necessary to safeguard the interests of the association and the public.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.17; T.C.A., § 45-1524.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

45-3-818. Commissioner may order any association to discontinue any illegal practice.

If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to the commissioner, or otherwise, finds that any association or any director, officer, or employee of any association is violating its charter or bylaws, this chapter, the laws of this state or of the United States or any lawful order or regulation of the commissioner, the commissioner shall deliver to the board of directors of the association a formal written order, in which are set forth the facts known to the commissioner, demanding the immediate discontinuance of the violation and conformance with all applicable requirements of this chapter, and any rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter. The order shall be delivered in person to the home office of the association in question by the commissioner or by the commissioner's agent or shall be sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the home office of the association in question. The order shall be effective from the time of receipt of the order by the association at its home office, and shall include a notice that the person or persons affected shall have the opportunity to request a hearing. If a hearing is so requested and held, the commissioner, on the basis of the evidence presented and any matters of record in the commissioner's office, shall either continue the order in effect, modify the same, or set it aside.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.18; T.C.A., § 45-1525.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-3-819. Removal of directors, officers, and employees participating in violations.

The commissioner may require that any director, officer, or employee of an association, who has participated in a violation described herein, be removed from the person's position or office in the association if the action of the person or persons concerned was knowingly and willfully taken. Prior to entering an order of removal, the commissioner shall deliver a full statement of the facts and conduct to which the commissioner objects to the board of directors of the association and to the person or persons concerned, stating the commissioner's intention to enter a removal order. The statement shall be delivered in person to the home office of the association served by the director, officer, or employee by the commissioner or by the commissioner's agent or shall be sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the home office of the association. The statement shall include a notice that the person or persons affected shall have the opportunity to request a hearing. If a hearing is so requested and held, the commissioner, on the basis of the evidence presented at the hearing, may proceed to enter an order for the immediate removal of the director, officer, or employee affected, or may reprimand the individuals and/or association concerned, or may dismiss the entire matter. If no hearing is requested within the time specified, the commissioner may proceed to enter an order of removal on the basis of the facts set forth in the commissioner's original statement.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.19; T.C.A., § 45-1526.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-801.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-3-820. Reliance upon action by commissioner.

No person shall be subjected to any civil or criminal liability for any act or omission to act in good faith in reliance upon a subsisting order, regulation, or interpretation of the commissioner, notwithstanding a subsequent decision by a court invalidating the order, regulation, or interpretation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 3.20; T.C.A., § 45-1527.